California statutes. Education Code
The governing board of a community college district may, upon complying with the provisions of this article, enter into and be a party to a community lease to which a city or other public agency and one or more private persons or private agencies are also parties for the leasing of the parcels of lands owned by the district and the other parties for the extraction and taking of gas not associated with oil, on such terms and conditions as the governing board of the district may prescribe. Such lease may be entered into without complying with any provisions of this code except as provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81511.

The board shall not enter into and be a party to any such lease unless the following conditions have been met:

(a) A resolution authorizing such action and prescribing the terms of the lease has been adopted by the unanimous vote of all the members elected or appointed to the board;

(b) Such resolution has been published in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district, or if there be no such newspaper, in a newspaper having a general circulation in the district, once a week for three weeks prior to the execution of the lease by
 the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81512.

No well for the production of gas shall be drilled on any land owned by the district and leased pursuant to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Lease and Lease-Purchase of Sites, Buildings, and Facilities [81520. - 81532.]

81520.

The provisions of this article shall govern the lease or lease-purchase of sites, buildings, and facilities by the governing board of community college district whenever the district is the lessee or purchaser and the lease or lease-purchase is not subject to Section 18 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81521.

For purposes of this article the following definitions shall govern:

(a) “Temporary-use building” is any building for which the intended use by the district at the time of entering into a lease contract or agreement is not for more than three years from the date of first occupancy.

(b) “Relocatable structure” is any structure that is designed to be relocated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81522.

(a) The governing board of a community college district may lease land for a term extending to the expected duration of use by the district.

(b) Any lease contract or agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall be initiated by resolution authorizing such action and prescribing the terms thereof adopted by vote of a majority of the members of the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81523.

(a) The governing board of a community college district may lease temporary-use buildings for a term extending to the expected duration of use by the district.

(b) Any lease agreement or contract entered into pursuant to this section shall be initiated by resolution authorizing such action and prescribing the terms thereof adopted by vote of a majority of the members of the governing board.

(c) A governing board of a community college district shall not enter into a lease pursuant to subdivision (a), unless the resolution
 adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) has been published in a newspaper published in the district and having a general circulation there; or if there is no such newspaper, then in a newspaper having a general circulation in the district; or if there is no such newspaper, then in a newspaper having a general circulation in a county in which the district or any part thereof is situated. Notice shall be published no less than once a week for three weeks prior to the execution of the lease by the board.

(d) Any temporary-use building in which students are expected to enter and which is leased under one, or successive leases, for a total time in excess of three years, or under a lease-purchase contract, shall be subject to the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130) and Article 8 (commencing with Section 81160) of Chapter 1 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

81523.5.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 81523, in order to adequately assess long-term site viability, any temporary use building that is 50,000 square feet or less which the Los Angeles Community College District leases under one, or successive leases, for a total time of five years or less, and in which students or faculty are expected to enter, shall be exempt from the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130) and Article 8 (commencing with
 Section 81160) of Chapter 1.

(b) This section does not apply to a lease with an effective date or effective renewal date that is on or after January 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 390, Sec. 8.   (AB 1240)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

81524.

Any lease contract or agreement entered into pursuant to Section 81523 shall be subject to the condition that the site on which any temporary-use building is located shall be owned by the district, or shall be under the control of the community college district pursuant to a lease or lease-purchase contract or agreement under the terms of which the land is leased to the district for a term at least as long as the intended use of the building, and under conditions that are compatible with the intended use of the building.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81525.

Any lease contract or agreement entered into pursuant to Section 81523 may provide for the joint use and occupancy by any public or private entity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81526.

(a) The governing board of a community college district may lease relocatable structures for a term extending to the expected duration of use by the district, but not to exceed 10 years.

(b) Any lease agreement or contract entered into pursuant to this section shall be initiated by resolution authorizing such action and prescribing the terms thereof adopted by vote of a majority of the members of the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81527.

In any lease made pursuant to Section 81526, it shall be competent to provide that the community college district lessee may purchase the relocatable structure at an agreed purchase price and that rental paid for the use of such structure or building shall be applied in whole or in part upon the purchase price.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81528.

Any lease contract or agreement entered into pursuant to Section 81526 shall be subject to the following conditions:

(a) A leased relocatable structure in which students are expected to enter and which is to be used for school purposes for a total time in excess of three years shall be subject to the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130) and Article 8 (commencing with Section 81160) of Chapter 1 of this part.

(b) Subdivision (a) of this section shall not apply to trailer coaches used for classrooms or laboratories if such
 trailer coaches conform to the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 18000) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder concerning mobilehomes, are not expanded or fitted together with other sections to form one unit greater than 16 feet in width, are used for special educational purposes, and are used by not more than 12 students at a time, except that such trailer coaches may be used by not more than 20 students at a time for driver training purposes. 

(c) The site on which a leased relocatable structure is located shall be owned by the community college district, or shall be under the control of the district pursuant to a lease or a permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

81529.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the governing board of a community college district may designate a building, which is primarily used for other than public school purposes, as an “offsite location” for the purpose of conducting instruction in educational programs as prescribed by the governing board, provided that such educational programs require an “offsite location” in order to adequately fulfill the objective of the educational program.

(b) Any building used as an “offsite location” pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be subject to Article 7
 (commencing with Section 81130) of, or Article 8 (commencing with Section 81160) of, Chapter 1 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

81530.

The governing board of a community college district may do all of the following:

(a) Lease buildings and other facilities, such as administrative offices, warehouses, athletic facilities, outdoor assembly facilities, auditoriums, quarters for adult education, transportation facilities, and communication facilities, for a period of not to exceed 12 years.

(b) Lease property from the federal government, the state, or any county, city
 and county, city, or district for the purpose of constructing school buildings and facilities thereon.

(c) Except as otherwise provided, any building leased for a total time in excess of three years, or under a lease-purchase agreement, shall be deemed the construction or alteration of a school building, as those terms are used in Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130). A building or facility used by a community college district under a lease or a lease-purchase agreement into which neither students nor teachers are required to enter and which would be excluded from the meaning of “school building” in Section 81160 shall not be considered to be a “school building” within the meaning of Section 81130.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 118.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

81530.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 81530, or any other provision of law, a community college district may lease an offsite commercial building that does not meet the requirements of Section 81130, for use as a school building, as defined in Section 81130.5, if the governing board of the district finds that all of the following conditions have been met:

(1) The building was constructed in accordance with seismic safety standards for commercial buildings constructed within an earthquake
 zone.

(2) The building permit for the initial construction of the building was issued on or after January 1, 1990.

(3) A structural engineer has inspected the building and submitted a report to the governing board of the community college district that certifies that the building is in substantial compliance with the requirements of this article. For purposes of this section, substantial compliance with this article means that the building is likely, without catastrophic collapse, to resist earthquake forces generated by major earthquakes of the intensity and severity of the strongest experienced in California, but may experience some reparable architectural or structural damage. This certification requirement is satisfied if the structural engineer affixes his or her seal of approval to the report and he or she attests in that report that to the best of his or her knowledge:

(A) He or she has reviewed the design calculations, construction documents, and the local government construction inspection records of the building, to the extent those items are available.

(B) He or she has authorized testing and has observed or reviewed the test results and the inspections of an adequate sample of the structure’s welds, anchor bolts, and other structural elements deemed necessary for the satisfactory performance of the building.

(C) He or she has observed that the overhead nonstructural elements, including, but not limited to, light fixtures, heating, and air-conditioning diffusers are adequately braced or anchored.

(b) The governing board of the community college district shall forward the report submitted pursuant to paragraph (3) of
 subdivision (a) to the Department of General Services for its review. Within 45 working days, the Department of General Services shall review the report for compliance with the above requirements, to provide feedback to the structural engineer regarding any insufficiencies with the report, and to determine whether or not the building is in substantial compliance with the requirements of this article. If the Department of General Services does not respond within 45 working days of the submission of the final and complete report, the department will be deemed to have concurred with the structural engineer’s report. A final decision by the governing board of the community college district to occupy the building for school purposes shall not occur until the governing board has reviewed and considered the feedback of the department, or the 45 workday review period has passed.

(c) (1) No member of the governing board of a
 community college district, nor any employee of a community college district, shall be held personally liable for injury to persons or damage to property resulting from the fact that the governing board of the community college district used a commercial building pursuant to this subdivision for a school and the building was not constructed under the requirements of Section 81130.

(2) The exemption from personal liability for members of the governing board and employees of a community college district described in paragraph (1) is not intended to limit the liability of the community college district for injury to persons or damage to property resulting from the fact that the governing board or any employee of the community college district used a commercial building pursuant to this subdivision for educational purposes and the building was not constructed under the requirements of Section 81130. The exemption from personal liability for members
 of the governing board and employees of a community college district described in paragraph (1) is not intended to limit the liability of the community college district, the governing board or the district’s employees pursuant to Section 835 of the Government Code.

(3) Section 81144 is not applicable to a person who, pursuant to this section, leases or uses a building for a community college building that meets the requirements of this section but does not meet the requirements of Section 81130. Approval and use of a building pursuant to this section does not constitute a violation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 610, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

81531.

Any lease or lease-purchase contract or agreement executed prior to the effective date of this article shall remain in full force and effect. The renewal of such contracts or agreements, however, shall be governed by the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81532.

Notwithstanding any limitations or requirements imposed by this article upon the leasing or renewal of leasing of relocatable structures on and after August 27, 1974, all acts and proceedings heretofore taken by or on behalf of any community college district for the lease of, or the renewal of a lease of, relocatable structures, including but not limited to trailers, are hereby confirmed, validated and declared to be legally effective and such lease agreements or renewals of such lease agreements are legal, valid and binding obligations if such lease agreements or renewals of such lease agreements would have otherwise been authorized under former Education Code Section
 15352 or 15352.5 had such sections not been repealed on August 27, 1974, by Chapter 547 of the Statutes of 1974.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Leasing of Equipment [81550. - 81553.]

81550.

A community college district may, as lessee, enter into a lease or lease-purchase agreement for equipment or service systems with any person, firm, corporation or public agency. As used in this article “equipment” includes (1) schoolbuses, (2) other motor vehicles, (3) test materials, educational films, and audiovisual materials, and (4) all other items defined as equipment or service systems in the Community College Budget and Accounting Manual.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81551.

Before a lease or lease-purchase agreement may be entered into, the lessee shall comply with all applicable provisions for bids and contracts prescribed by Article 3 (commencing with Section 81641) of Chapter 3 and by Section 20651 of the Public Contract Code. Each contract shall show the total price for an outright purchase of any item and also its total cost for the entire specified term of the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

81552.

The term of any lease or lease-purchase agreement shall not exceed the estimated useful life of the item but in no event shall the term exceed 10 years. A lease, but not a lease-purchase agreement, may be renewable at the option of the lessee and the lessor, jointly, at the end of each term at a rate not more than 7 percent annually above the rate set pursuant to the existing agreement. In no event shall the combined period of the original lease and renewals or extensions exceed 10 years. Any contract for the lease or lease-purchase of equipment or service systems which was in existence prior to the effective date of this act shall remain in effect and such terms are hereby
 ratified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81553.

As a lessor, a community college district governing board is authorized to let, or let with option to purchase, any land, buildings, or equipment it determines is not needed for school purposes for a term extending to the end of the expected nonuse of the land, buildings, or equipment and under any conditions it deems reasonable. All such leases and leases with options to purchase to nonpublic agencies or individuals shall comply with the provisions of Sections 81450, 81452, 81453, and 81454.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Los Angeles Community College District Affordable Housing Pilot Program [81560. - 81563.]

81560.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Affordable housing for students or employees” means a housing development with a majority of its rents restricted to levels that are affordable to low-income students, or employees who are persons and families of low or moderate income.

(b) “Low-income student” means a student whose income and asset level does not exceed the level required for the Cal Grant A award or Cal Grant B award.

(c) “Persons and families of low or moderate income” has the same meaning as defined in Section 50093 of the
 Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 572, Sec. 1.   (SB 330)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 81563.)
-------------------------------------------

81561.

(a) (1) The governing board of the Los Angeles Community College District shall develop and implement a pilot program, pursuant to this article, to provide affordable housing to students or employees of the Los Angeles Community College District.

(2) Priority shall be given to low-income students experiencing homelessness for the affordable units of the affordable housing for students or employees. The
 student’s homelessness status may be verified by a homeless services provider, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 103577 of the Health and Safety Code, the Los Angeles Community College District, or a campus of the community college district if it has knowledge of the student’s status.

(b) (1) The governing board of the Los Angeles Community College District shall, not later than January 1, 2032, provide a report to the Legislature with findings and recommendations on the success of the program.

(2) The report in paragraph (1) shall be submitted to the Legislature in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 572, Sec. 1.   (SB 330)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 81563.)
-------------------------------------------

81562.

(a) The governing board of the Los Angeles Community College District may let to any nonprofit entity, private person, firm, or corporation, any real property that belongs to the Los Angeles Community College District if the instrument by which the property is let requires the lessee to construct on the demised premises, or provide for the construction on the real property of, a building or buildings for the joint use of the Los Angeles Community College District and the nonprofit entity, private person, firm, or corporation during the term of the lease or agreement if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The title to that portion of the building to be occupied
 by the nonprofit entity, private person, firm, or corporation remains
 exclusively the personal property of the nonprofit entity or private party during the term of the lease and the title to the portion of the building to be occupied by the Los Angeles Community College District vests in the Los Angeles Community College District upon completion of the building or buildings and acceptance of the building or buildings by the Los Angeles Community College District.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no rental fee or other charge for the use of the building or buildings is paid by the Los Angeles Community College District.

(b) For a lease or agreement entered into pursuant to subdivision (a), if the constructed building or buildings are developed and operated as affordable housing for students or employees of the Los
 Angeles Community College District, or for both those students and employees, the Los Angeles Community College District and the nonprofit entity, private person, firm, or corporation may agree to waive the condition that no rental fee or other charge is to be paid by the Los Angeles Community College District for the portion of the building that is for the exclusive use of the Los Angeles Community College District.

(c) The Los Angeles Community College District may enter into a lease or agreement with a nonprofit entity, private person, firm, or corporation for the joint occupancy of the real property and buildings of the Los Angeles Community College District, in accordance with this chapter, if the real property and buildings are intended for affordable housing for students or employees of the Los Angeles Community College District, or
 for both those students and employees.

(d) A lease or agreement under this article for joint occupancy of real property and buildings of the Los Angeles Community College District that are intended for affordable housing for students or employees of the Los Angeles Community College District, or for both those students and employees, shall not exceed a term of 66 years.

(e) The governing board of the Los Angeles Community College District may lease real property for less than fair rental value, as defined in Section 82542, to any entity that intends to enter into a lease or agreement with the Los Angeles Community College District for joint occupancy of the real property and buildings of the Los Angeles Community College District to develop and operate affordable housing
 for students or employees of the Los Angeles Community College District, or for both those students and employees, and the lease or agreement is consistent with Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 572, Sec. 1.   (SB 330)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 81563.)
-------------------------------------------

81563.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 572, Sec. 1.   (SB 330)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 17, commencing with Section 81560.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Management and Control of Property [81600. - 81678.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [81600. - 81606.]

81600.

The governing board of a community college district shall manage and control school property within its district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81601.

The governing board of a community college district shall furnish, repair, insure against fire, and in its discretion rent the school property of its districts. The governing board may also insure the property against other perils. The insurance shall be written in any admitted insurer, or in any nonadmitted insurer to the extent and subject to the conditions prescribed in Section 1763 of the Insurance Code. Insurance on property of a district may be, in the discretion of the governing board, of the deductible type of coverage. By deductible type of coverage is meant a form of insurance under which the insurance becomes operative when the loss and damage exceeds an amount stipulated in the policy or policies.

The governing board, in their notice of bid for district construction, may indicate that it may elect to assume the cost of fire insurance by adding the coverage to the district’s existing policy and in such event bids made on such construction shall be made in the alternative, with and without the fire insurance coverage included, and the governing board shall make its election as to who shall secure and pay for such insurance at the time of accepting the bid. The deductible amount of fire insurance for any community college district may exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each occurrence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81602.

The governing board of a community college district may, by resolution, establish a fund or funds, as designated by the California Community Colleges Budget and Accounting Manual, for losses, and payments including, but not limited to, health and welfare benefits for its employees as defined by Section 53200 of the Government Code, district property, any liability, and workers’ compensation, in the county treasury for the purpose of covering the deductible amount under deductible types of insurance policies, losses or payments arising from self-insurance programs, or losses or payments due to noninsured perils. In the fund or funds shall be placed sums, to be provided in the budget of the district, that will create an amount which, together with investments made from the fund or funds, will be sufficient in the judgment of the governing board to protect the district from such losses or to provide for payments on the deductible amount under deductible types of insurance policies, losses or payments arising from self-insurance programs, or losses or payments due to noninsured perils. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the governing board from providing protection against such losses to district property or liability for the payment of claims partly by means of the fund or funds and partly by means of insurance written by acceptable insurers as provided in Section 81601.

The fund or funds shall be considered as separate and apart from all other funds of the district, and the balance therein shall not be considered as being part of the working cash of the district in compiling annual budgets.

Warrants may be drawn on or transfers made from the fund or funds so created only to reimburse or indemnify the community college district for losses as herein specified, and for the payment of claims, administrative costs, related services, and to provide for deductible insurance amounts and purchase of excess insurance. The warrants or transfers shall be within the purpose of the fund or funds as established by resolution of the governing board.

The cash placed in the fund or funds may be invested and reinvested by the county treasurer, with the advice and consent of the governing board of the district, in securities which are legal investments for surplus county funds in this state. The income derived from the investments, together with interest earned on uninvested funds, shall be considered revenue of and be deposited in the fund. The cost of contracts or services authorized by this section are appropriate charges against the respective fund.

The governing board may contract for investigative, administrative, and claims adjustment services relating to claims. The contract may provide that the contracting firm may reject, settle, compromise and approve claims against the district, its officers or employees, within the limits and for amounts that the governing board may specify, and may provide that the contracting firm may execute and issue checks in payment of such claims, which checks shall be payable only from a trust account which may be established by the governing board. Funds in the trust account established by the board pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not exceed a sum sufficient as determined by the governing board to provide for the settlement of claims for a 30-day period. The rejection or settlement and approval of a claim by the contracting firm in accordance with the terms of the contract shall have the same effect as would the rejection or settlement and approval of such a claim by the governing board.

The contract may also provide that the contracting firm may employ legal counsel, subject to terms and limitations that the board may prescribe, to advise the contracting firm concerning the legality and advisability of rejecting, settling, compromising and paying claims referred to said contracting firm by the board for investigation and adjustment, or to represent the board in litigation concerning the claims. The compensation and expenses of the attorney for services rendered to the board shall be an appropriate charge against the appropriate fund. 

The contract provided for in this section may contain other terms and conditions that the governing board may consider necessary or desirable to effectuate the board’s self-insured programs.

In lieu of, or in addition to, contracting for the services described in this section, the governing board may authorize an employee or employees to perform any or all of the services and functions which the board may contract for under the provisions of this section.

As used in this section, “firm” includes a person, corporation, or other legal entity, including a county superintendent of schools.

Prior to funding health and welfare benefits pursuant to this section, the community college district shall secure the services of an actuary enrolled under subtitle C of Title III of the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, to provide actuarial evaluations of the future annual costs of such benefits. The future annual costs as determined by the actuary shall be made public at a public meeting at least two weeks prior to the commencement of funding health and welfare benefits pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 931, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

81603.

Nothing in the Education Code shall be construed as prohibiting two or more community college districts subject to Section 81601 from performing the powers prescribed in Section 81602, through a joint powers agreement made pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81605.

In community college districts situated within or partly within cities having a population of over five hundred thousand (500,000) as determined by the 1920 federal census any board of education may establish a fund in the county treasury for the purpose of covering fire losses to school property in lieu of carrying fire insurance in admitted insurers as provided in Section 81601 of this code. In such fund shall be placed such sums, to be provided in the budget of the district, as will create an amount which, together with investments made from such fund, will be sufficient in the judgment of the board of education upon the advice of competent actuaries to protect such board of education against losses by fire on all or any part of the school property within its jurisdiction. Nothing contained herein shall be construed as prohibiting the board of education from providing protection against fire losses partly by means of such fund and partly by means of fire insurance written by admitted insurers as provided in Section 81601.

Such fund shall be considered as separate and apart from all other funds of the district and the balance therein shall not be considered as being part of the working cash of the district in compiling annual budgets or fixing annual tax rates.

Warrants shall not be drawn on or transfers made from the fund so created except to reimburse the district for losses by fire and then only after resolution duly adopted by the county board of education based upon findings by competent appraisers.

The cash placed in such fund may be invested and reinvested by the county treasurer with the advice and consent of the county board of education in securities which are legal investments for surplus county funds in this state. The income derived from such investments together with interest earned on uninvested funds shall be considered revenue of and be deposited in such fund.

The county treasurer shall make quarterly reports to the county board of education as to the condition of the fund, using as a basis for such report the cost or market value, whichever may be the lower, of the securities held as investments plus the cash in such fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

81606.

The governing board of any community college district may grade, pave, construct sewers, or otherwise improve streets and other public places in front of real property owned or controlled by it, and also may construct in immediate proximity to any school or site owned or controlled by the district, pedestrian tunnels, overpasses, footbridges, sewers and water pipes when required for school or administrative purposes, may acquire property, easements and rights-of-way for such purpose, and may appropriate money to pay the cost and expense of the improvements, whether made by the board under contract executed by the board, or under contracts made in pursuance of any of the general laws of the state respecting street improvements, or under other contracts made in pursuance of the charter of any county or municipality.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Statewide Energy Management Program [81620. - 81624.]

81620.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Statewide Energy Management Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 2.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

81621.

The definitions set forth in this section govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Commission” means the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.

(b) “Energy independence” means the utilization of existing and developing technologies to meet energy needs onsite, including, but not necessarily limited to, the utilization of solar, fuel cells, and other renewable and clean onsite energy sources, the optimization of the use of daylighting, the use of passive solar orientation, and the use of construction techniques that minimize energy loss, such as appropriate insulation and lighting fixtures.

(c) “Energy management plans” means the plans that community colleges develop with guidance from the Statewide Energy Management Program to implement energy efficiency projects such as sustainable green buildings, renovations, and wind or solar farms that will move the community colleges toward energy independence.

(d) “Program” means the Statewide Energy Management Program, established under this article, which is a state program modeled after the Federal Energy Management Program.

(e) “Renewable or other distributed energy systems” means alternative efficient sources of energy such as daylighting, photovoltaic panels (rooftops or solar farms), passive solar heating, fuel cells, and steam. Diesel-fueled electric generating systems are not included in this definition.

(f) “Sustainable green building” means a building that has been designed to reduce both direct and indirect environmental consequences associated with construction, occupancy, operation, maintenance, and eventual decommissioning, and whose design is evaluated for cost, quality of life, future flexibility, ease of maintenance, energy and resource efficiency, and overall environmental impact, with an emphasis on life-cycle cost analysis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 2.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

81622.

(a) (1) In Executive Order D-16-00, issued August 2, 2000, Governor Davis directed state agencies to design and construct buildings that incorporate energy efficiency, resource conservation, and renewable technologies. In his State of the State Address delivered on January 8, 2001, Governor Davis expressed his support for the goal of moving the California Community Colleges toward energy independence.

(2) The Federal Energy Management Program, upon which the State Energy Management Program is modeled, has resulted in approximately four dollars ($4) in savings for every one dollar ($1) spent. The federal investment of two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) in energy efficiency has resulted in savings of six billion three hundred million dollars ($6,300,000,000) on energy bills.

(b) In consultation with the commission, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall further develop and refine certain guidelines for a Statewide Energy Management Program that have been established under an ongoing joint effort of the commission and DeAnza College. This statewide effort shall allow community college districts to achieve energy independence through the development of energy management plans, the construction of sustainable green buildings, the use of renewable or other distributed energy systems, and the expansion of statewide energy education programs and services.
